dictsource/sl_rules
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Slovenian
// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.L01 b d g j l m n v z ž   // voiced consonants

.L03 a e
.L04 l v

.replace
//	Cyrl	Latn	-- Cyrillic to Latin
	а	a	// U+0430
	б	b	// U+0431
	в	v	// U+0432
	г	g	// U+0433
	д	d	// U+0434
	е	e	// U+0435
	ж	ž	// U+0436
	з	z	// U+0437
	и	i	// U+0438
	к	k	// U+043A
	л	l	// U+043B
	м	m	// U+043C
	н	n	// U+043D
	о	o	// U+043E
	п	p	// U+043F
	р	r	// U+0440
	с	s	// U+0441
	т	t	// U+0442
	у	u	// U+0443
	ф	f	// U+0444
	х	h	// U+0445
	ц	c	// U+0446
	ч	č	// U+0447
	ш	š	// U+0161
	ђ	đ	// U+0452
	ѓ	đ	// U+0453
	ѕ	dz	// U+0455
	ј	j	// U+0458
	љ	lj	// U+0459
	њ	nj	// U+045A
	ћ	ć	// U+045B
	ќ	ć	// U+045C
	џ	dž	// U+045F

.group a
        a        a:
        a (X$w_alt3+  'a

        a (č_    'a:
        a (j_    'a:
        a (l_    'a:
        

.group b
        b        b

.group c
        c        ts

.group č
        č        tS

.group ć
        ć        tS;
        
.group d
        d        d
        dz       dz
        dž       dZ


.group e
        e        e:
        e (X$w_alt3+  'E
        
        ee       i:
    _n) ee       E:E
    _r) ee       E:E
   _pr) ee       E:E

        e (X$w_alt4 @
     @) e (n_    E#
    @C) e (r_    E#

     _) e (r     E:


.group f
        f        f


.group g
        g        g


.group h
        h        x
     i) h        h
        h (F     h   // before voiceless consonant


.group i
        i        i:
        i (X$w_alt3+  'i
        i (A     j
        
        i (l_    'i:

.group j
        j        j


.group k
        k        k


.group l
        l        l
        l (K     w
     K) l (K     @l
     K) l (rK    l
     K) l (_     u
     @) l (_     w
        lj       l^
        lj (A    lj
        lj (i    l^


.group m
        m        m
        m (g     N
        m (k     N
     K) m (K     m@-  // unstressed
     K) m (r     m


.group n
        n        n
        n (g     N
        n (k     N

     K) n (K     n@-  // unstressed
     K) n (r     n
        nj       n^
        nj (A    nj
        nj (i    n^


.group o
        o        o:
        o (X$w_alt3+  'O
        
        o (Co    O:
        o (CCo   O:
        o (L04+  o:

        o (č_    'o:
        o (j_    'o:
        o (l_    'o:
        o (oč    o:

        
.group p
        p        p


.group q
        q        k
        qu       kv


.group r
        r        R
        rr       R

     K) r (K     @R


.group s
        s        s
        sch      S


.group š
        š        S


.group t
        t        t
   Krs) t (_     _|t


.group u
        u        u:
        u (X$w_alt3+  'u

        u (A     w
     A) u (K     w
     C) ue (C    u:    // German names
     j) u (čeno  'u:


.group v
        v        v
        v (-A+   v    // preposition 'v' before a vowel
     A) v (K     w
     K) v (K     %u
        v (r+    v
   L01) v (A     v#


.group w
        w        w


.group x
        x        ks


.group y
        y        j
     K) y (K     i


.group z
        z        z


.group ž
        ž        Z


.group
	á	'a:
	é	'e:
	ê	'E:
	è	'E
	í	'i:
	ó	'o:
	ô	'O:
	ò	'O
	ú	'u:
        đ        dZ
        ř        R^
        ä        E:
        ö        @:
        ü        y:
        ß        _^_DE
